apertium-arg.arg.dix
<pardef n="portavo/z__n">
  <e>       <p><l>z</l>         <r>z<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ces</l>       <r>z<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>zes</l>       <r>z<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>


<pardef n="troz__n">
  <e>       <p><l>os</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    
  <e r="LR"><p><l>o</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>



<pardef n="anal/ís__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ís</l>        <r>ís<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ises</l>      <r>ís<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>isi</l>       <r>ís<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>isis</l>      <r>ís<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="malam/ent__adv">
  <e>       <p><l>ent</l>       <r>ent<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ente</l>      <r>ent<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>én</l>        <r>ent<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="cap/ín__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ín</l>        <r>ín<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>ino</l>       <r>ín<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ins</l>       <r>ín<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>íns</l>       <r>ín<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>inos</l>      <r>ín<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ina</l>       <r>ín<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>inas</l>      <r>ín<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>

<pardef n="cap/ín__adj_adv">
  <e>       <p><l>ín</l>        <r>ín<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>ino</l>       <r>ín<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ins</l>       <r>ín<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>íns</l>       <r>ín<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>inos</l>      <r>ín<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ina</l>       <r>ín<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>inas</l>      <r>ín<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inam</l>      <r>inam</r></p><par n="malam/ent__adv"/></e>

</pardef>

<pardef n="charr/ín__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ín</l>        <r>ín<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ins</l>       <r>ín<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>íns</l>       <r>ín<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ina</l>       <r>ín<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inas</l>      <r>ín<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="palest/ino__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ino</l>       <r>ino<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>ín</l>        <r>ino<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ins</l>       <r>ino<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>inos</l>      <r>ino<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>íns</l>       <r>ino<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ina</l>       <r>ino<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>inas</l>      <r>ino<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>

<pardef n="palest/ino__adj_adv">
  <e>       <p><l>ino</l>       <r>ino<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>ín</l>        <r>ino<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ins</l>       <r>ino<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>inos</l>      <r>ino<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>íns</l>       <r>ino<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ina</l>       <r>ino<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>inas</l>      <r>ino<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inam</l>      <r>inam</r></p><par n="malam/ent__adv"/></e>
</pardef>
  


<pardef n="occit/án__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>án</l>        <r>án<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>ano</l>       <r>án<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ans</l>       <r>án<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>anos</l>      <r>án<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>áns</l>       <r>án<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ana</l>       <r>án<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>anas</l>      <r>án<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>
    
<pardef n="matut/án__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>án</l>        <r>án<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ans</l>       <r>án<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    
  <e r="LR"><p><l>áns</l>       <r>án<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ana</l>       <r>án<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>anas</l>      <r>án<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>

<pardef n="matut/án__adj_adv">
  <e>       <p><l>án</l>        <r>án<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ans</l>       <r>án<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    
  <e r="LR"><p><l>áns</l>       <r>án<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ana</l>       <r>án<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>anas</l>      <r>án<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  
  <e>       <p><l>anam</l>      <r>anam</r></p><par n="malam/ent__adv"/></e>


</pardef>

<pardef n="tard/ano__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ano</l>       <r>ano<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>án</l>        <r>ano<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ans</l>       <r>ano<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>anos</l>      <r>ano<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>áns</l>       <r>ano<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ana</l>       <r>ano<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>anas</l>      <r>ano<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>

<pardef n="tard/ano__adj_adv">
  <e>       <p><l>ano</l>       <r>ano<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>án</l>        <r>ano<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ans</l>       <r>ano<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>anos</l>      <r>ano<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>áns</l>       <r>ano<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ana</l>       <r>ano<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>anas</l>      <r>ano<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>anam</l>      <r>anam</r></p><par n="malam/ent__adv"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="archentino">      <i>archent</i><par n="palest/ino__adj"/></e>
<e lm="cerrino"><i>cerr</i><par n="palest/ino__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tocino"><i>toc</i><par n="palest/ino__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bizantino"><i>bizant</i><par n="palest/ino__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ladino"><i>lad</i><par n="palest/ino__adj_adv"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="booleano"> <p><l>bole</l>      <r>boole</r></p><par n="tard/ano__adj"/></e>
<e lm="booleano">        <i>boole</i><par n="tard/ano__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bovino">          <i>bov</i><par n="palest/ino__adj"/></e>
<e lm="castellán">       <i>castell</i><par n="occit/án__adj"/></e>
<e lm="femenino">         <i>femen</i><par n="palest/ino__adj"/></e>
<e lm="gaussiano">       <i>gaussi</i><par n="tard/ano__adj"/></e>
<e lm="humán">           <i>hum</i><par n="occit/án__adj"/></e>
<e lm="inhumán">         <i>inhum</i><par n="occit/án__adj"/></e>
<e lm="masculino">        <i>mascul</i><par n="palest/ino__adj"/></e>
<e lm="metropolitano">   <i>metropolit</i><par n="occit/án__adj"/></e>
<e lm="norteamericano">  <i>norteameric</i><par n="occit/án__adj"/></e>
<e lm="pelegrín"><i>pelegr</i><par n="cap/ín__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="beduín"><i>bedu</i><par n="cap/ín__adj"/></e>
<e lm="montesín"><i>montes</i><par n="cap/ín__adj"/></e>
<e lm="capín"><i>cap</i><par n="cap/ín__adj"/></e>
<e lm="asasín"><i>asas</i><par n="cap/ín__adj"/></e>
<e lm="albín"><i>alb</i><par n="cap/ín__adj"/></e>
<e lm="focín"><i>foc</i><par n="cap/ín__adj"/></e>
<e lm="mandarín"><i>mandar</i><par n="charr/ín__adj"/></e>
<e lm="chafardín"><i>chafard</i><par n="charr/ín__adj"/></e>
<e lm="chiquín"><i>chiqu</i><par n="charr/ín__adj"/></e>
<e lm="chugarrín"><i>chugarr</i><par n="charr/ín__adj"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="chugarrín"><p><l>chugar</l><r>chugarr</r></p><par n="charr/ín__adj"/></e>
<e lm="chiquirrín"><i>chiquirr</i><par n="charr/ín__adj"/></e>
<e lm="malandrín"><i>malandr</i><par n="charr/ín__adj"/></e>
<e lm="calchín"><i>calch</i><par n="charr/ín__adj"/></e>
<e lm="zaurín"><i>zaur</i><par n="charr/ín__adj"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="roín"><p><l>ru</l><r>ro</r></p><par n="charr/ín__adj"/></e>
<e lm="peruano">         <i>peru</i><par n="occit/án__adj"/></e>
<e lm="revolvín">        <i>revolv</i><par n="cap/ín__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sahariano">       <i>sahari</i><par n="tard/ano__adj"/></e>
<e lm="suburbano">       <i>suburb</i><par n="tard/ano__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sudamericano">    <i>sudameric</i><par n="occit/án__adj"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="sudamericano"><p><l>surameric</l><r>sudameric</r></p><par n="occit/án__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tarambán">        <i>taramb</i><par n="matut/án__adj"/></e>
<e lm="toled">           <i>toled</i><par n="occit/án__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ucrainiano">      <i>ucraini</i><par n="occit/án__adj"/></e>
<e lm="galán">      <i>gal</i><par n="matut/án__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="serpentín">      <i>serpent</i><par n="cap/ín__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="arcano">          <i>arc</i><par n="tard/ano__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="dominicano">      <i>dominic</i><par n="tard/ano__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="guipuzcuano">     <i>guipuzcu</i><par n="tard/ano__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="infrahumano">     <i>infrahum</i><par n="tard/ano__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="marciano">        <i>marci</i><par n="tard/ano__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="miliciano">       <i>milici</i><par n="tard/ano__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="pagano">          <i>pag</i><par n="tard/ano__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="sobirano">        <i>sobir</i><par n="tard/ano__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="uerfano">         <i>uerf</i><par n="tard/ano__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="victoriano">      <i>victori</i><par n="tard/ano__adj_adv"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="cortesment"><p><l>cortesam</l> <r>cortesm</r></p><par n="malam/ent__adv"/></e>
<e lm="cortesment">      <i>cortesm</i><par n="malam/ent__adv"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="cortesment"><p><l>cortésm</l>  <r>cortesm</r></p><par n="malam/ent__adv"/></e>
<e lm="talment">         <i>talm</i><par n="malam/ent__adv"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="analís">   <i>anal</i><par n="anal/ís__n"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="archentino"><p><l>argent</l>   <r>archent</r></p><par n="palest/ino__adj"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="autoanalís" i="yes"><i>autoanal</i><par n="anal/ís__n"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="criptoanalís" i="yes"><i>criptoanal</i><par n="anal/ís__n"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="electroanalís" i="yes"><i>electroanal</i><par n="anal/ís__n"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="paralís">  <i>paral</i><par n="anal/ís__n"/></e>
<e lm="portavoz">        <i>portavo</i><par n="portavo/z__n"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="psicoanalís" i="yes"><i>psicoanal</i><par n="anal/ís__n"/></e>
<e lm="trozo">           <i>troz</i><par n="troz__n"/></e>
<e lm="mas que malament"><par n="/mas__var"/><i><b/>que<b/>malam</i><par n="malam/ent__adv"/></e>
<e lm="latín">           <par n="/l_ll__var"/><i>at</i><par n="cap/ín__adj"/></e>
